Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202016-320
City engineer; duties.

The city engineer of a city of the first class shall make a record of the minutes of his or her surveys and of all work done for the city, including sewers, extension of water systems and heating systems, electric light and sewerage systems, and power plants, and accurately make such plats, sections, profiles, and maps as may be necessary in the prosecution of any public work, which shall be public records and belong to the city and be turned over to his or her successor.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 28, p. 237;

R.S.1913, § 4886;

C.S.1922, § 4054;

C.S.1929, § 16-316;

R.S.1943, § 16-320;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 62;

Laws 2019, LB194, § 14.

Appointment of a board of public works is entirely optional. State ex rel. City of Grand Island v. Union Pacific R. R. Co., 152 Neb. 772, 42 N.W.2d 867 (1950).